Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6303.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 4j. Notwithstanding any other provision of this act or the code, the director shall not promulgate and an enforcing agency shall not enforce a rule that requires a person to use air tightness testing to verify the continuity of the building envelope of a commercial building. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 6304 (request no. H07577'26) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.